Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-903
Submitting controversy without action; procedure.

Parties to a question which might be the subject of a civil action may without action agree upon a case containing the facts upon which the controversy depends, and present a submission of the same to any court which would have jurisdiction if an action had been brought. But it must appear by affidavit that the controversy is real, and the proceedings in good faith, to determine the rights of the parties. The court shall, thereupon, hear and determine the case, and render judgment as if an action were pending.

R.S.1867, Code § 567, p. 493;

R.S.1913, § 7719;

C.S.1922, § 8663;

C.S.1929, § 20-903;

R.S.1943, § 25-903.

For declaratory judgments, see sections 25-21,149 to 25-21,164.

If interests are adverse, case is not moot, though it is friendly suit. State v. First Catholic Church of Lincoln, 88 Neb. 2, 128 N.W. 657 (1910).

It is the duty of Supreme Court to act when controversy is submitted under this section. In re Groff, 21 Neb. 647, 33 N.W. 426 (1887).